Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201979-1158
Special education and support services programs; reimbursement; when.

No reimbursement for special education and support services programs shall be allowed unless the program meets the standards established by the department.

Laws 1973, LB 403, § 13;

Laws 1976, LB 761, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 43-651;

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 46;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3346;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 840;

Laws 1997, LB 865, § 11;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 42.
May 28, 2019